Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.765

Opioid drugs—Warning—Patient education materials.

(1) The department must create a statement warning individuals about the risks of opioid use and abuse and provide information about safe disposal of opioids. The department must provide the warning on its website.

(2) The department must review the science, data, and best practices around the use of opioids and their associated risks. As evidence and best practices evolve, the department must update its warning to reflect these changes.

(3) The department must update its patient education materials to reflect the patient's right to refuse an opioid prescription or order.

[ 2019 c 314 s 11.]

NOTES:

Declaration—2019 c 314: See note following RCW 18.22.810.